Utah statutes.
20A-1-509.1.   Procedure for filling midterm vacancy in county or district
with 15 or more attorneys.
(1)  When a vacancy occurs in the office of county or district attorney in a
county or district having 15 or more attorneys who are licensed active members
in good standing with the Utah State Bar and registered voters, the vacancy
shall be filled as provided in this section.
(2) (a)  The requirements of this Subsection (2) apply when the office of
county attorney or district attorney becomes vacant and:
(i)  the vacant office has an unexpired term of two years or more; and
(ii)  the vacancy occurs before the third Friday in March of the even-numbered
year.
(b)  When the conditions established in Subsection (2)(a) are met, the county
clerk shall notify the public and each registered political party that the
vacancy exists.
(c)  All persons intending to become candidates for the vacant office shall:
(i)  file a declaration of candidacy according to the procedures and
requirements of Title 20A, Chapter 9, Part 2, Candidate Qualifications and
Declarations of Candidacy;
(ii)  if nominated as a party candidate or qualified as an independent or
write-in candidate under Title 20A, Chapter 9, Candidate Qualifications and
Nominating Procedures, run in the regular general election; and
(iii)  if elected, complete the unexpired term of the person who created the
vacancy.
(d)  If the vacancy occurs after the second Friday in March and before the
third Friday in March, the time for filing a declaration of candidacy under
Section 20A-9-202 shall be extended until seven days after the county clerk
gives notice under Subsection (2)(b), but no later than the fourth Friday in
March.
(3) (a)  The requirements of this Subsection (3) apply when the office of
county attorney or district attorney becomes vacant and:
(i)  the vacant office has an unexpired term of two years or more; and
(ii)  the vacancy occurs after the third Friday in March of the even-numbered
year but more than 50 days before the regular primary election.
(b)  When the conditions established in Subsection (3)(a) are met, the county
clerk shall:
(i)  notify the public and each registered political party that the vacancy
exists; and
(ii)  identify the date and time by which a person interested in becoming a
candidate must file a declaration of candidacy.
(c)  All persons intending to become candidates for the vacant office shall:
(i)  within five days after the date that the notice is made, ending at 5 p.m.
on the fifth day, file a declaration of candidacy for the vacant office as
required by Title 20A, Chapter 9, Part 2, Candidate Qualifications and
Nominating Procedures; and
(ii)  if elected, complete the unexpired term of the person who created the
vacancy.
(d)  The county central committee of each party shall:
(i)  select a candidate or candidates from among those qualified candidates
who have filed declarations of candidacy; and
(ii)  certify the name of the candidate or candidates to the county clerk at
least 35 days before the regular primary election.
(4) (a)  The requirements of this Subsection (4) apply when the office of
county attorney or district attorney becomes vacant and:
(i)  the vacant office has an unexpired term of two years or more; and
(ii)  50 days or less remain before the regular primary election but more than
50 days remain before the regular general election.
(b)  When the conditions established in Subsection (4)(a) are met, the county
central committees of each registered political party that wish to submit a
candidate for the office shall summarily certify the name of one candidate to
the county clerk for placement on the regular general election ballot.
(c)  The candidate elected shall complete the unexpired term of the person who
created the vacancy.
(5) (a)  The requirements of this Subsection (5) apply when the office of
county attorney or district attorney becomes vacant and:
(i)  the vacant office has an unexpired term of less than two years; or
(ii)  the vacant office has an unexpired term of two years or more but 50 days
or less remain before the next regular general election.
(b)  When the conditions established in Subsection (5)(a) are met, the county
legislative body shall give notice of the vacancy to the county central
committee of the same political party of the prior officeholder and invite
that committee to submit the names of three nominees to fill the vacancy.
(c)  That county central committee shall, within 30 days of receiving notice
from the county legislative body, submit to the county legislative body the
names of three nominees to fill the vacancy.
(d)  The county legislative body shall, within 45 days after the vacancy
occurs, appoint one of those nominees to serve out the unexpired term.
(e)  If the county legislative body fails to appoint a person to fill the
vacancy within 45 days, the county clerk shall send to the governor a letter
that:
(i)  informs the governor that the county legislative body has failed to
appoint a person to fill the vacancy within the statutory time period; and
(ii)  contains the list of nominees submitted by the party central committee.
(f)  The governor shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy from that list of
nominees within 30 days after receipt of the letter.
(g)  A person appointed to fill the vacancy under Subsection (5) shall
complete the unexpired term of the person who created the vacancy.
(6)  Nothing in this section prevents or prohibits independent candidates from
filing a declaration of candidacy for the office within the required time
limits.
